Utah statutes.
76-10-509.   Possession of dangerous weapon by minor.

(1)  A minor under 18 years of age may not possess a dangerous weapon unless he:

(a)  has the permission of his parent or guardian to have  the weapon; or

(b)  is accompanied by a parent or guardian while he has  the weapon in his possession.

(2)  Any minor under 14 years of age in possession of a dangerous weapon shall be accompanied by a responsible adult.

(3)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of:

(a)  a class B misdemeanor upon the first offense; and

(b)  a class A misdemeanor for each subsequent offense.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1993 Special Session 2

